District of Columbia statutes.
31-708.01

Rules.

The Mayor shall, pursuant to subchapter I of Chapter 5 of Title 2 [§ 2-501 et seq.], issue rules to implement the provisions of this subchapter.

History

Oct. 21, 1993, D.C. Law 10-44, § 10, 40 DCR 6027